Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1117.05
State employee; payment of wages;
methods authorized.

The Department of Administrative Services
may make payments that include, but are not
limited to, wages and reimbursable expenses to state employees
by electronic funds transfer or a similar means of direct deposit. For purposes of this section, state employee
means any person or officer employed by the state who works a full-time or
part-time schedule on an ongoing basis.

Laws 2001, LB 308, § 1;

Laws 2009, LB167, § 2.